Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1320.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Children of incarcerated parents task force; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The children of incarcerated parents task force is established consisting of: 1. The following members who are appointed by the governor. (a) Two members who are from an organization that advocates for adolescents, youth or incarcerated parents in this state. (b) Two members who are the adult children of a parent who has been incarcerated. (c) Two members who are parents and who were formerly incarcerated. (d) One member who is a researcher and who has studied issues related to the impact of incarceration on youth. (e) One member who is from an organization in this state that facilitates visitation between incarcerated parents and their children. (f) One county attorney who is from a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons or the county attorney's designee. (g) One county attorney who is from a county with a population of five hundred thousand persons or more or the county attorney's designee. (h) One member of the Arizona criminal justice commission who represents a county with a population of five hundred thousand persons or more or the member's designee. (i) One member of the Arizona criminal justice commission who represents a county with a population of less than five hundred thousand persons or the member's designee. (j) One member who is a chief probation officer or the chief probation officer's designee. 2. The director of the department of economic security or the director's designee. 3. The director of the state department of corrections or the director's designee. 4. The director of the department of juvenile corrections or the director's designee. 5. The director of the governor's office of youth, faith and family or the director's designee. 6. The director of the Arizona peace officer standards and training board or the director's designee. 7. The director of the administrative office of the courts or the director's designee. 8. The attorney general or the attorney general's designee. 9. The presiding judge of the juvenile court in Maricopa county or the presiding judge's designee. 10. One member of the senate who is appointed by the president of the senate. 11. One member of the house of representatives who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 12. One member of the senate who is appointed by the minority leader of the senate. 13. One member of the house of representatives who is appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. B. Members of the task force shall be appointed not later than six months after the effective date of this section. C. Task force members are not eligible to receive compensation or reimbursement of expenses under title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. At the first meeting of the task force, the members shall elect a chairperson. E. The task force shall meet at least quarterly or at the call of the chairperson. F. The task force shall: 1. Focus on providing every child who has an incarcerated parent in this state with all of the following rights: (a) To be kept safe and informed at the time of the parent's arrest. (b) To be heard when decisions are made about the child. (c) To be considered when decisions are made about the child's parent. (d) To be well cared for in the parent's absence. (e) To speak with, see and touch the parent. (f) To be supported as the child faces the parent's incarceration. (g) To not be judged, blamed or labeled because the child's parent is incarcerated. (h) To have a lifelong relationship with the parent. 2. Identify service gaps in behavioral health support and coordinate with faith-based, educational and community organizations in this state to ensure accessible, trauma-informed, preventive interventions for the children of incarcerated parents. 3. Track key indicators, including all of the following: (a) The number of children of incarcerated parents who are reached by the task force. (b) The number of faith-based community partnerships that are established. (c) Any reports on parental contact and reintegration support. 4. Partner with local congregations, faith leaders and volunteers to raise awareness, facilitate peer support groups and deliver stress management and self-awareness programs for the children of incarcerated parents and their caregivers. 5. On or before June 30, 2028, submit a report regarding the task force's findings and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. G. This section is repealed from and after June 30, 2028.